Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,185
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; remedial action plan; approval or disapproval; notification.

Upon receipt of a voluntary remedial action plan for land pollution or water pollution pursuant to section 81-15,184, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall review and approve or disapprove the plan and notify the applicant in writing. If the plan is disapproved, the notification shall state the reason for the disapproval and provide a reasonable opportunity to resubmit the plan.

Laws 1994, LB 1349, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 449, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 141;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 431.